Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1022.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(b) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.--* * *(b) As used in this act:* * *"Community college" means an institution created under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), 12345678910111213141516171819202122 known as the Public School Code of 1949, or the act of August 24, 1963 (P.L.1132, No.484), known as the Community College Act of 1963.* * *"Coprescribe" means the practice of prescribing or dispensing an emergency opioid antagonist in conjunction with an opioid prescription."Correctional institution" means a correctional institution as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions) or a facility that confines a juvenile under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).* * *"Emergency opioid antagonist" means a drug, including naloxone, approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the complete or partial reversal of an opioid-related overdose.* * *"Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education operated not for profit, located within this Commonwealth and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth, entitled to confer degrees as provided in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and entitled to apply to itself the designation "college" or "university" as provided for by standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries).* * *"Nonpublic school" means a nonprofit school, other than a public school in this Commonwealth, at which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school 20250SB1022PN1187 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attendance requirements of Article XIII of the Public School Code of 1949 and that meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 Subch. V (relating to federally assisted programs).* * *"Opioid" means any of the following:(1) A preparation or derivative of opium.(2) A synthetic narcotic that has opiate-like effects but is not derived from opium.(3) A group of naturally occurring peptides that bind at or otherwise influence opiate receptors, including an opioid agonist.* * *"Public institution of higher education" means a community college, State-owned institution or State-related institution approved by the Department of Education."Public school" means a public school as defined in section 1101-B of the Public School Code of 1949.* * *"State-owned institution" means an institution that is part of the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the Public School Code of 1949."State-related institution" means The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University or Lincoln University, including the branch campuses of these institutions.* * *Section 2. Section 13.8 of the act is amended to read:Section 13.8. Drug Overdose Medication.--(a) The department, in carrying out its duties under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 1023 (relating to personnel), shall have the following duties:20250SB1022PN1187 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Amend the prehospital practitioner scope of practice of emergency medical services providers to include the administration of an opioid antagonist.(2) In consultation with the Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council, implement training, treatment protocols, equipment lists and other policies and procedures for all types of emergency medical services providers.(3) In consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, develop or approve model training programs and instructional materials [about recognizing opioid-related overdoses, administering an opioid antagonist and promptly seeking medical attention. The training and instruction materials shall be provided free of charge on the Internet.] according to the following:(i) The model training programs and instructional materials shall cover the following items:(A) The importance of emergency opioid antagonists in preventing deaths from opioid-related overdoses.(B) How to recognize the signs and symptoms of opioid-related overdoses.(C) The essential steps in responding to an opioid-related overdose, including administering emergency opioid antagonists and promptly seeking medical attention.(D) Where and how to obtain emergency opioid antagonists in this Commonwealth.(E) How to destigmatize the possession of an emergency opioid antagonist.(F) State laws, including this section, limiting civil and criminal liability for prescribing, dispensing, distributing or administering emergency opioid antagonists or for contacting law 20250SB1022PN1187 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement for individuals believed to be experiencing an opioid-related overdose.(ii) The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall publish the model training programs and instruction materials free of charge on the departments' publicly accessible Internet websites.(iii) Model training programs and instructional materials prepared for public schools, nonpublic schools and institutions of higher education under this paragraph shall comply with all of the following:(A) Be age appropriate.(B) Be developed in consultation with the Department of Education.(C) Include guidelines for the trainings described under subsections (i) and (j).(iv) Model training programs and instructional materials prepared for correctional institutions under this paragraph shall include guidelines for the trainings described under subsection (c.2) and shall be developed in consultation with the Department of Corrections.(v) The department shall tailor the model training programs to the unique needs of each of the following groups:(A) Individuals who may potentially administer an emergency opioid antagonist to individuals exhibiting the signs of an opioid-related overdose.(B) Prescribers and dispensers.(C) Law enforcement officers and firefighters.(D) Emergency medical services providers.(E) Laypeople and bystanders.(F) Public schools, nonpublic schools and public 20250SB1022PN1187 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institutions of higher education.(G) Correctional institution staff.(H) Community-based organizations.(4) In consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs and community-based organizations, establish a Statewide educational initiative to promote the items listed under paragraph (3)(i) and any additional measures that promote safe distribution, use and administration of emergency opioid antagonists in this Commonwealth.(b) A law enforcement agency, fire department or fire company may enter into written agreements with emergency medical services agencies, with the consent of that agency's medical director or a physician, to do the following:(1) Obtain a supply of an emergency opioid antagonist.(2) Authorize a law enforcement officer or firefighter who has completed training under subsection (a)(2), or who has received the training and instructional materials under subsection (a)(3), to administer an emergency opioid antagonist to an individual undergoing or believed to be undergoing an opioid-related drug overdose.(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a health care professional otherwise authorized to prescribe an emergency opioid antagonist may dispense, prescribe or distribute the emergency opioid antagonist directly or by a standing order to an authorized law enforcement officer or firefighter in accordance with an agreement under subsection (b) or to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose or family member, friend or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose.(c.1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a health 20250SB1022PN1187 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care professional issuing an initial or renewal prescription for an opioid in this Commonwealth shall coprescribe an emergency opioid antagonist.(c.2) (1) A correctional institution shall provide training and instructional materials developed by the department under subsection (a)(3) to employes of the correctional institution and incarcerated individuals. Employes and volunteers of a correctional institution may take part in a training program developed through the department under subsection (a)(3).(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a health care professional authorized to issue prescriptions for opioids in this Commonwealth may prescribe emergency opioid antagonists in the name of a correctional institution to be maintained for use under paragraph (5).(3) A correctional institution shall maintain at the correctional institution in a safe, secure location a supply of emergency opioid antagonists.(4) Individuals who are responsible for the storage and use of emergency opioid antagonists under this subsection must successfully complete training developed by the department under subsection (a)(3).(5) A correctional institution shall establish a prisoner release program to do all of the following on the day of an individual's release from incarceration:(i) Offer the individual an emergency opioid antagonist.(ii) Provide the individual with instructions on the use of emergency opioid antagonists in the form of a written pamphlet or other accessible instructional materials for an individual with a disability.(iii) Require the individual to sign a written form 20250SB1022PN1187 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 indicating that the individual has been given the opportunity to receive an emergency opioid antagonist.(iv) Provide the individual with information regarding where and how to obtain additional emergency opioid antagonist doses locally.(6) When offering an emergency opioid antagonist under paragraph (5), the individual shall be given as much of the emergency opioid antagonist as the individual requests and is reasonably available at the correctional institution.(d) The provisions of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the "Pharmacy Act," shall not apply to a law enforcement officer or firefighter who stores an emergency opioid antagonist pursuant to an agreement under subsection (b), and in accordance with directions from the health care professional that prescribed, dispensed or distributed the emergency opioid antagonist, or to a person or organization acting at the direction of a health care professional authorized to prescribe an emergency opioid antagonist so long as such activities are undertaken without charge or compensation.(e) (1) A licensed health care professional who, acting in good faith, prescribes or dispenses an emergency opioid antagonist shall not be subject to any criminal or civil liability or any professional disciplinary action for:(i) such prescribing or dispensing; or(ii) any outcomes resulting from the eventual administration of the emergency opioid antagonist.(2) The immunity under paragraph (1) shall not apply to a health professional who acts with intent to harm or with reckless indifference to a substantial risk of harm.20250SB1022PN1187 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) (1) A person, law enforcement agency, fire department or fire company under subsection (b)(2) [or (c)], (c) or (c.2) who, acting in good faith and with reasonable care, administers an emergency opioid antagonist to another person whom the person believes to be suffering an opioid-related drug overdose:(i) Shall be immune from criminal prosecution, sanction under any professional licensing statute and civil liability for such act.(ii) Shall not be subject to professional review for such act.(iii) Shall not be liable for any civil damages for acts or omissions resulting from such act.(2) Receipt of training and instructional materials that meet the criteria of subsection (a) and the prompt seeking of additional medical assistance shall create a rebuttable presumption that the person acted with reasonable care in administering an emergency opioid antagonist.(g) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit any existing immunities for emergency response providers and others provided for under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity).[(h) As used in this section, the term "opioid antagonist" means a drug or device approved by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid overdose, including naloxone hydrochloride or other similarly acting drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose.](i) (1) Each public school or public institution of higher 20250SB1022PN1187 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education shall authorize at least one school employe trained under paragraph (5) to:(i) Provide an emergency opioid antagonist that meets the prescription on file for the public school or public institution of higher education to a student or employe.(ii) Administer to a student or employe an emergency opioid antagonist that meets the prescription on file for the public school or public institution of higher education.(iii) Administer an emergency opioid antagonist that meets the prescription on file for the public school or public institution of higher education to a student or employe that the administering employe believes in good faith to be having an opioid-related overdose.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a health care professional authorized to issue prescriptions for opioids in this Commonwealth may prescribe emergency opioid antagonists in the name of the public school or public institution of higher education to be maintained for use under paragraph (1).(3) A public school or public institution of higher education shall maintain at the public school or public institution of higher education in a safe, secure location a supply of emergency opioid antagonists.(4) A public school or public institution of higher education shall designate one or more employes at the public school or public institution of higher education who shall be responsible for the storage and use of the opioid emergency antagonists.(5) An employe who is responsible for the storage and use of emergency opioid antagonists under paragraph (4) must 20250SB1022PN1187 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 successfully complete a model training program developed by the department under subsection (a)(3).(6) An employe may utilize an emergency opioid antagonist from the school's or institution's supply to administer to a student or employe in response to an opioid-related overdose under paragraph (1)(iii).(7) If a student or employe is believed to be having an opioid-related overdose, the public school's or public institution of higher education's nurse or an employe under paragraph (4) shall contact 911 as soon as possible.(8) At the request of a parent or legal guardian of a public school student or student at a public institution of higher education who is a minor, the student shall be exempt from paragraphs (1), (6) and (9). The principal of each public school or a member of the governing body of each public institution of higher education shall notify all parents or legal guardians of the ability to exempt their minor children from paragraphs (1), (6) and (9) by returning a signed opt-out form.(9) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to an individual who administers an emergency opioid antagonist under this subsection.(10) Administration of an emergency opioid antagonist under this subsection shall comply with 29 U.S.C. § 794 (relating to nondiscrimination under Federal grants and programs) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students).(11) A public school or public institution of higher education shall provide training and instructional materials developed by the department under subsection (a)(3) to employes 20250SB1022PN1187 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and students. All employes of public schools and public institutions of higher education may take part in a training program.(j) (1) A nonpublic school or institution of higher education may authorize at least one employe trained under paragraph (5) to:(i) Provide an emergency opioid antagonist that meets the prescription on file for the nonpublic school or institution of higher education to a student or employe.(ii) Administer to a student or employe an emergency opioid antagonist that meets the prescription on file for the nonpublic school or institution of higher education.(iii) Administer an emergency opioid antagonist that meets the prescription on file for the nonpublic school or institution of higher education to a student or employe that the administering employe believes in good faith to be having an opioid-related overdose.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a health care professional authorized to issue prescriptions for opioids in this Commonwealth may prescribe emergency opioid antagonists in the name of the nonpublic school or institution of higher education to be maintained for use under paragraph (1).(3) A nonpublic school or institution of higher education may maintain at the nonpublic school or institution of higher education in a safe, secure location a supply of emergency opioid antagonists.(4) A nonpublic school or institution of higher education that authorizes the provision of emergency opioid antagonists under this subsection shall designate one or more employes at 20250SB1022PN1187 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the nonpublic school or institution of higher education who shall be responsible for the storage and use of the opioid emergency antagonists.(5) An employe who is responsible for the storage and use of emergency opioid antagonists must successfully complete training as described under subsection (a)(3).(6) An employe trained under paragraph (5) may utilize an emergency opioid antagonist from the nonpublic school's or institution of higher education's supply to administer emergency opioid antagonists to a student or employe in response to an opioid-related overdose under paragraph (1)(iii).(7) If a student or employe is believed to be having an opioid-related overdose, the nonpublic school's or institution of higher education's nurse or an employe under paragraph (4) shall contact 911 as soon as possible.(8) At the request of a parent or legal guardian of a nonpublic school student or student at an institution of higher education who is a minor, the student shall be exempt from paragraphs (1), (6) and (9). The principal of each nonpublic school or a member of the governing body of each institution of higher education shall notify all parents and legal guardians of the ability to exempt their minor children from paragraphs (1), (6) and (9) by returning a signed opt-out form.(9) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 and 8337.1 shall apply to an individual who administers an emergency opioid antagonist under this subsection.(10) Administration of an emergency opioid antagonist under this subsection shall comply with 29 U.S.C. § 794 and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15.(11) A nonpublic school or institution of higher education 20250SB1022PN1187 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may provide training and instructional materials developed by the department under subsection (a)(3) to employes and students. All employes of nonpublic schools and institutions of higher education may take part in the training.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1022PN1187 - 14 - 12345